Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.935

Faculty counselors—Minimum standards.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide clear minimum standards to ensure qualified faculty counselors while also providing flexibility to allow for differences in criteria required by hiring institutions. Within existing resources, and beginning September 1, 2021, the college board shall adopt rules regarding the minimum hiring standards for a faculty counselor. At a minimum, these must include:

(a) A graduate or professional degree in a related field;

(b) Completion of appropriate graduate coursework; and

(c) Standards established by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(2) The requirements and standards imposed through this section do not apply to an individual employed by a college district as a counselor before September 1, 2021. Counselors who began employment at one college district prior to September 1, 2021, and moved employment to a different college district after that date may carry the exemptions from the requirements and standards imposed through this section to their new place of employment.

[ 2021 c 272 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—Short title—2021 c 272: See notes following RCW 28B.50.920.